Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-803
Definitions, where found.

For purposes
of the Nebraska Educational,
Health, and Social Services Finance Authority Act, unless the
context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 58-804 to 58-812 shall apply.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2903;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1703;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 3.
September 6, 2013